District of Columbia statutes.
7-736.02

Communicable and Chronic Disease Prevention and Treatment Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Communicable and Chronic Disease Prevention and Treatment Fund (“Fund”), to be administered by the Department of Health in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of revenue from the following sources related to the prevention and treatment of communicable and chronic diseases by the Department of Health:

(1)

Third-party payors;

(2)

Sliding-fee scale collections; and

(3)

Other collections.

(c)

The Fund shall be used for operations necessary to provide communicable and chronic disease prevention and treatment services.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4907b
as added Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5012(b), 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5012(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5012(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5012(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).